Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1087.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; I-494 CORRIDOR COMMISSION.new text end new text begin (a) $300,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $300,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of transportation for grants to the I-494 Corridor Commission to provide programming and service expansion, including but not limited to staffing, communications, outreach and education program development, and operations management. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must not retain any portion of the appropriation under this section and must make grant payments in full by July 31 in each year. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end